Florida, session 2026, HB369.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
28
29 Section 1. Present subsections (15) through (22) of
30 section 765.101, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
31 subsections (16) through (23), respectively, a new subsection
32 (15) is added to that section, and subsections (1) and (7) of
33 that section are amended, to read:
34 765.101 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
35 (1) "Advance directive" means a witnessed written document
36 or oral statement in which instructions are given by a principal
37 or in which the principal's desires are expressed concerning any
38 aspect of the principal's health care or health information, and
39 includes, but is not limited to, the designation of a health
40 care surrogate, a living will, or an anatomical gift made
41 pursuant to part V of this chapter. An advance directive may
42 also include a patient-directed medical order.
43 (7) "Health care facility" means a hospital, nursing home,
44 hospice, home health agency, or health maintenance organization
45 licensed in this state; a, or any facility subject to part I of
46 chapter 394; or an assisted living facility or adult family-care
47 home licensed under chapter 429.
48 (15) "Patient-directed medical order" means a medical
49 order created by the principal in collaboration with a
50 physician, a physician assistant, or an advanced practice
Page 2 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
51 registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 which is portable
52 across health care settings and accessible in a voluntary online
53 registry.
54 Section 2. Subsection (6) of section 765.102, Florida
55 Statutes, is amended to read:
56 765.102 Legislative findings and intent.—
57 (6) For purposes of this chapter:
58 (a) Palliative care is the comprehensive management of the
59 physical, psychological, social, spiritual, and existential
60 needs of patients. Palliative care is especially suited to the
61 care of persons who have incurable or, progressive illnesses.
62 (b) Palliative care may must include:
63 1. An opportunity to discuss and plan for end-of-life
64 care.
65 2. Assurance that physical and mental suffering will be
66 carefully attended to.
67 3. Assurance that preferences for withholding and
68 withdrawing life-sustaining interventions will be honored.
69 4. Assurance that the personal goals of the dying person
70 will be addressed.
71 5. Assurance that the dignity of the dying person will be
72 a priority.
73 6. Assurance that health care providers will not abandon
74 the dying person.
75 7. Assurance that the burden to family and others will be
Page 3 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
76 addressed.
77 8. Assurance that advance directives for care, orders not
78 to resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45, and patient-
79 directed medical orders executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 will be
80 respected regardless of the location of care.
81 9. Assurance that organizational mechanisms are in place
82 to evaluate the availability and quality of end-of-life,
83 palliative, and hospice care services, including the evaluation
84 of administrative and regulatory barriers.
85 10. Assurance that necessary health care services will be
86 provided and that relevant reimbursement policies are available.
87 11. Assurance that the goals expressed in subparagraphs
88 1.-10. will be accomplished in a culturally appropriate manner.
89 Section 3. Section 765.3041, Florida Statutes, is created
90 to read:
91 765.3041 Patient-directed medical orders.—
92 (1) To facilitate a principal's instructions concerning
93 treatment preferences, a patient-directed medical order may be
94 executed in advance to direct the actions of health care
95 providers and health care facilities.
96 (2) A valid patient-directed medical order must:
97 (a) Be on a form adopted by rule of the Department of
98 Health and may be combined with an order not to resuscitate
99 executed pursuant to s. 401.45. The form must:
100 1. Address medical interventions to be withheld or
Page 4 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
101 withdrawn when the application of life-prolonging procedures
102 would serve only to prolong artificially the process of dying.
103 2. Be signed by the principal and the principal's
104 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered
105 nurse registered under s. 464.0123.
106 a. If the principal is physically unable to sign the form,
107 the physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice
108 registered nurse present at the discussion as required by
109 subparagraph (b)1. may subscribe the principal's signature in
110 the principal's presence and at the principal's direction. If
111 telehealth is used, the physician, physician assistant, or
112 advanced practice registered nurse may be present at either
113 location where telehealth is being administered.
114 b. If the principal is incapacitated, the form may be
115 signed by the principal's health care surrogate or proxy, court-
116 appointed guardian as provided in chapter 744, or attorney in
117 fact under a durable power of attorney as provided in chapter
118 709. The court-appointed guardian or attorney in fact must be
119 delegated authority to make health care decisions on behalf of
120 the principal.
121 c. All signatures may be electronic signatures.
122 (b) Clearly express the principal's preferences and
123 instructions for care, which may include all treatments
124 available, modified treatments that are not prolonged or
125 burdensome, or comfort measures that do not pursue or continue
Page 5 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
126 interventions.
127 1. The principal and a physician, a physician assistant,
128 or an advanced practice registered nurse registered under s.
129 464.0123 must discuss the principal's medical treatment wishes
130 relating to medical interventions to be withheld or withdrawn
131 based on the principal's values and preferences in the event the
132 principal becomes unable to make her or his own decisions.
133 2. The discussion must be in person and may be conducted
134 using telehealth.
135 (3) Regardless of the decision to withhold or withdraw
136 life-prolonging procedures, necessary health care services must
137 be provided for the care and comfort of the principal or to
138 alleviate pain.
139 (4) A physician, a physician assistant, or an advanced
140 practice registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 may
141 withhold or withdraw cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other
142 life-prolonging procedures if presented with an order not to
143 resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed
144 medical order executed pursuant to this section which contains
145 an order not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw
146 life-prolonging procedures. A physician, a physician assistant,
147 or an advanced practice registered nurse registered under s.
148 464.0123 is not subject to any disciplinary action under s.
149 456.072 or criminal prosecution or civil liability, or
150 considered to have engaged in negligent or unprofessional
Page 6 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
151 conduct, for withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary
152 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures pursuant to
153 such orders. The absence of an order not to resuscitate executed
154 pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical order
155 executed pursuant to this section does not preclude a physician,
156 a physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse
157 registered under s. 464.0123 from withholding or withdrawing
158 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging
159 procedures as otherwise authorized by law.
160 Section 4. Paragraph (l) of subsection (3) of section
161 395.1041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
162 395.1041 Access to and ensurance of emergency services;
163 transfers; patient rights; diversion programs; reports of
164 controlled substance overdoses.—
165 (3) EMERGENCY SERVICES; DISCRIMINATION; LIABILITY OF
166 FACILITY OR HEALTH CARE PERSONNEL.—
167 (l) Hospital personnel may withhold or withdraw
168 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging
169 procedures if presented with an order not to resuscitate
170 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical
171 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order
172 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-
173 prolonging procedures. Facility staff and facilities are shall
174 not be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability, or
175 nor be considered to have engaged in negligent or unprofessional
Page 7 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
176 conduct, for withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary
177 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures pursuant to
178 such orders an order. The absence of an order not to resuscitate
179 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical
180 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 does not preclude a
181 physician from withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary
182 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures as otherwise
183 authorized permitted by law.
184 Section 5. Subsection (3) of section 400.142, Florida
185 Statutes, is amended to read:
186 400.142 Emergency medication kits; orders not to
187 resuscitate and patient-directed medical orders.—
188 (3) Facility staff may withhold or withdraw
189 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging
190 procedures if presented with an order not to resuscitate
191 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical
192 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order
193 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-
194 prolonging procedures. Facility staff and facilities are not
195 subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability, or
196 considered to have engaged in negligent or unprofessional
197 conduct, for withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary
198 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures pursuant to
199 such orders order. The absence of an order not to resuscitate
200 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical
Page 8 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
201 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 does not preclude a
202 physician from withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary
203 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures as otherwise
204 authorized permitted by law.
205 Section 6. Subsection (7) of section 400.487, Florida
206 Statutes, is amended to read:
207 400.487 Home health service agreements; physician's,
208 physician assistant's, and advanced practice registered nurse's
209 treatment orders; patient assessment; establishment and review
210 of plan of care; provision of services; orders not to
211 resuscitate and patient-directed medical orders.—
212 (7) Home health agency personnel may withhold or withdraw
213 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging
214 procedures if presented with an order not to resuscitate
215 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical
216 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order
217 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-
218 prolonging procedures. The agency shall adopt rules providing
219 for the implementation of such orders. Home health personnel and
220 agencies are shall not be subject to criminal prosecution or
221 civil liability, or nor be considered to have engaged in
222 negligent or unprofessional conduct, for withholding or
223 withdrawing cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-
224 prolonging procedures pursuant to such orders an order and rules
225 adopted by the agency. The absence of an order not to
Page 9 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
226 resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed
227 medical order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 does not preclude
228 a physician from withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary
229 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures as otherwise
230 authorized by law.
231 Section 7. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of section
232 400.605, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
233 400.605 Administration; forms; fees; rules; inspections;
234 fines.—
235 (1) The agency shall by rule establish minimum standards
236 and procedures for a hospice pursuant to this part. The rules
237 must include:
238 (e) Procedures relating to the implementation of advance
239 advanced directives, patient-directed medical orders executed
240 pursuant to s. 765.3041, and do-not-resuscitate orders not to
241 resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45.
242 Section 8. Subsection (8) of section 400.6095, Florida
243 Statutes, is amended to read:
244 400.6095 Patient admission; assessment; plan of care;
245 discharge; death.—
246 (8) The hospice care team may withhold or withdraw
247 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging
248 procedures if presented with an order not to resuscitate
249 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical
250 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order
Page 10 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
251 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-
252 prolonging procedures. The agency shall adopt rules providing
253 for the implementation of such orders. Hospice staff are shall
254 not be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability, or
255 nor be considered to have engaged in negligent or unprofessional
256 conduct, for withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary
257 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures pursuant to
258 such orders an order and applicable rules. The absence of an
259 order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a
260 patient-directed medical order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041
261 does not preclude a physician from withholding or withdrawing
262 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging
263 procedures as otherwise authorized permitted by law.
264 Section 9. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
265 400.611, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
266 400.611 Interdisciplinary records of care;
267 confidentiality; release of records.—
268 (4) A hospice may not release a patient's
269 interdisciplinary record or any portion thereof, unless the
270 person requesting the information provides to the hospice:
271 (b) In the case of an incapacitated patient, a patient
272 authorization executed before prior to the patient's death by
273 the patient's then acting legal guardian, health care surrogate
274 as defined in s. 765.101 s. 765.101(21), health care proxy as
275 defined in s. 765.101 s. 765.101(19), or agent under power of
Page 11 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
276 attorney;
277 Section 10. Subsection (4) of section 401.35, Florida
278 Statutes, is amended to read:
279 401.35 Rules.—The department shall adopt rules, including
280 definitions of terms, necessary to carry out the purposes of
281 this part.
282 (4) The rules must establish circumstances and procedures
283 under which emergency medical technicians and paramedics may
284 honor orders not to resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45
285 or patient-directed medical orders executed pursuant to s.
286 765.3041 which contain an order not to resuscitate or an order
287 to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging procedures by the
288 patient's physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice
289 registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 not to resuscitate
290 and the documentation and reporting requirements for handling
291 such orders requests.
292 Section 11. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (3) of
293 section 401.45, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
294 401.45 Denial of emergency treatment; civil liability.—
295 (3)(a) Resuscitation may be withheld or withdrawn from a
296 patient by An emergency medical technician or paramedic may
297 withhold or withdraw cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other
298 life-prolonging procedures if presented with evidence of an
299 order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to this subsection or
300 a patient-directed medical order executed pursuant to s.
Page 12 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
301 765.3041 which contains an order not to resuscitate or an order
302 to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging procedures by the
303 patient's physician or physician assistant is presented to the
304 emergency medical technician or paramedic. An order not to
305 resuscitate executed pursuant to this subsection or a patient-
306 directed medical order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which
307 contains an order not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or
308 withdraw life-prolonging procedures, to be valid, must be on the
309 form adopted by rule of the department. The form must be signed
310 by the patient's physician, or physician assistant, or advanced
311 practice registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 and by
312 the patient or, if the patient is incapacitated, the patient's
313 health care surrogate or proxy as provided in chapter 765,
314 court-appointed guardian as provided in chapter 744, or attorney
315 in fact under a durable power of attorney as provided in chapter
316 709. The court-appointed guardian or attorney in fact must have
317 been delegated authority to make health care decisions on behalf
318 of the patient.
319 (b) Any licensee, physician, medical director, or
320 emergency medical technician or paramedic who acts under the
321 direction of a medical director is not subject to criminal
322 prosecution or civil liability, and has not engaged in negligent
323 or unprofessional conduct, as a result of the withholding or
324 withdrawal of cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-
325 prolonging procedures from a patient pursuant to this subsection
Page 13 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
326 and rules adopted by the department.
327 Section 12. Subsection (4) of section 429.255, Florida
328 Statutes, is amended to read:
329 429.255 Use of personnel; emergency care.—
330 (4) Facility staff may withhold or withdraw
331 cardiopulmonary resuscitation, or the use of an automated
332 external defibrillator, or other life-prolonging procedures if
333 presented with an order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to
334 s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical order executed pursuant
335 to s. 765.3041 which contains an order not to resuscitate or an
336 order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging procedures. The
337 agency shall adopt rules providing for the implementation of
338 such orders. Facility staff and facilities are may not be
339 subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability, or nor be
340 considered to have engaged in negligent or unprofessional
341 conduct, for withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary
342 resuscitation, the or use of an automated external
343 defibrillator, or other life-prolonging procedures pursuant to
344 such orders an order and rules adopted by the agency. The
345 absence of an order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to s.
346 401.45 or a patient-directed medical order executed pursuant to
347 s. 765.3041 does not preclude a physician from withholding or
348 withdrawing cardiopulmonary resuscitation, the or use of an
349 automated external defibrillator, or other life-prolonging
350 procedures as otherwise authorized permitted by law.
Page 14 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
351 Section 13. Subsection (3) of section 429.73, Florida
352 Statutes, is amended to read:
353 429.73 Rules and standards relating to adult family-care
354 homes.—
355 (3) The agency shall adopt rules providing for the
356 implementation of orders not to resuscitate and patient-directed
357 medical orders. The provider may withhold or withdraw
358 cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-prolonging
359 procedures if presented with an order not to resuscitate
360 executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical
361 order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order
362 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-
363 prolonging procedures. The provider is shall not be subject to
364 criminal prosecution or civil liability, or nor be considered to
365 have engaged in negligent or unprofessional conduct, for
366 withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary resuscitation or
367 other life-prolonging procedures pursuant to such orders an
368 order and applicable rules. The absence of an order not to
369 resuscitate executed pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed
370 medical order executed pursuant to s. 765.3041 does not preclude
371 a physician from withholding or withdrawing cardiopulmonary
372 resuscitation or other life-prolonging procedures as otherwise
373 authorized by law.
374 Section 14. Subsections (1), (7), and (8) of section
375 744.4431, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
Page 15 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
376 744.4431 Guardianship power regarding life-prolonging
377 procedures.—
378 (1) Except as provided in this section, decisions by a
379 professional guardian, as defined in s. 744.102, to withhold or
380 withdraw life-prolonging procedures from, or to execute an order
381 not to resuscitate pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed
382 medical order pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order
383 not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-
384 prolonging procedures for, a ward must be approved by the court.
385 A professional guardian appointed to act on behalf of a ward's
386 person must petition the court pursuant to the Florida Probate
387 Rules for authority to consent to withhold or withdraw life-
388 prolonging procedures or to execute an order not to resuscitate
389 pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical order
390 pursuant to s. 765.3041. Court approval must be obtained before
391 taking such action, except as provided in subsection (7).
392 (7) Court approval is not required for the following
393 decisions:
394 (a) A decision to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging
395 procedures made by a professional guardian to whom authority has
396 been granted by the court under s. 744.3115 to carry out the
397 instructions in or to take actions consistent with the ward's
398 advance directive, order not to resuscitate executed pursuant to
399 s. 401.45, or patient-directed medical order executed pursuant
400 to s. 765.3041 which contains an order not to resuscitate or an
Page 16 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
401 order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging procedures, as
402 long as there are no known objections from the ward; the ward's
403 attorney; the ward's next of kin, if known; and any other
404 interested persons as the court may direct based on s.
405 765.105(1).
406 (b) A decision by a professional guardian who has been
407 delegated health care decisionmaking authority to execute an
408 order not to resuscitate pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-
409 directed medical order pursuant to s. 765.3041, as described in
410 s. 401.45(3)(a), if the ward is in a hospital and the following
411 conditions are met:
412 1. The ward's primary treating physician and at least one
413 other consulting physician document in the ward's medical record
414 that:
415 a. There is no reasonable medical probability for recovery
416 from or a cure of the ward's underlying medical condition;
417 b. The ward is in an end-stage condition, a terminal
418 condition, or a persistent vegetative state as those terms are
419 defined in s. 765.101, and that the ward's death is imminent;
420 and
421 c. Resuscitation will cause the ward physical harm or
422 additional pain.
423 2. The professional guardian has notified the ward's next
424 of kin, if known, and any interested persons as the court may
425 direct and the decision is not contrary to the ward's expressed
Page 17 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
426 wishes and there are no known objections from the ward; the
427 ward's attorney; the ward's next of kin, if known; or any other
428 interested persons as the court may direct on the basis of s.
429 765.105(1).
430 (8) Within 2 business days after executing an order not to
431 resuscitate pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical
432 order pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order not to
433 resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging
434 procedures under paragraph (7)(b), a professional guardian must
435 notify the court in writing of all of the following:
436 (a) The date the order not to resuscitate or patient-
437 directed medical order was executed.
438 (b) The location of the ward when the order not to
439 resuscitate or patient-directed medical order was executed.
440 (c) The names of the physicians who documented the ward's
441 condition in the ward's medical record.
442 Section 15. Subsection (3) of section 752.001, Florida
443 Statutes, is amended to read:
444 752.001 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
445 (3) "Persistent vegetative state" has the same meaning as
446 provided in s. 765.101 s. 765.101(15).
447 Section 16. Subsections (1) and (4) of section 765.110,
448 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
449 765.110 Health care facilities and providers; discipline.—
450 (1) A health care facility, pursuant to Pub. L. No. 101-
Page 18 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
451 508, ss. 4206 and 4751, shall provide to each patient written
452 information concerning the individual's rights concerning
453 advance directives, orders not to resuscitate executed pursuant
454 to s. 401.45, or patient-directed medical orders executed
455 pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contain an order not to
456 resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging
457 procedures and the health care facility's policies respecting
458 the implementation of such rights, and shall document in the
459 patient's medical records whether or not the individual has
460 executed an advance directive, an order not to resuscitate
461 pursuant to s. 401.45, or a patient-directed medical order
462 pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order not to
463 resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging
464 procedures.
465 (4) The Department of Health, in consultation with the
466 Department of Elderly Affairs, for health care providers; the
467 Agency for Health Care Administration for hospitals, hospices,
468 nursing homes, home health agencies, assisted living facilities,
469 adult family-care homes, and health maintenance organizations;
470 and the Department of Children and Families for facilities
471 subject to part I of chapter 394 shall adopt rules to implement
472 this section.
473 Section 17. Subsection (3) of section 765.204, Florida
474 Statutes, is amended to read:
475 765.204 Capacity of principal; procedure.—
Page 19 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
476 (3) The surrogate's authority commences either upon a
477 determination under subsection (2) that the principal lacks
478 capacity or upon a stipulation of such authority pursuant to s.
479 765.101 s. 765.101(21). Such authority remains in effect until a
480 determination that the principal has regained such capacity, if
481 the authority commenced as a result of incapacity, or until the
482 authority is revoked, if the authority commenced immediately
483 pursuant to s. 765.101 s. 765.101(21). Upon commencement of the
484 surrogate's authority, a surrogate who is not the principal's
485 spouse shall notify the principal's spouse or adult children of
486 the principal's designation of the surrogate. Except if the
487 principal provided immediately exercisable authority to the
488 surrogate pursuant to s. 765.101 s. 765.101(21), in the event
489 that the primary or attending physician determines that the
490 principal has regained capacity, the authority of the surrogate
491 shall cease, but recommences if the principal subsequently loses
492 capacity as determined pursuant to this section. A health care
493 provider is not liable for relying upon health care decisions
494 made by a surrogate while the principal lacks capacity. At any
495 time when a principal lacks capacity, a health care decision
496 made on the principal's behalf by a surrogate is effective to
497 the same extent as a decision made by the principal. If a
498 principal possesses capacity, health care decisions of the
499 principal take precedence over decisions made by the surrogate
500 that present a material conflict.
Page 20 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
501 Section 18. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
502 765.205, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
503 765.205 Responsibility of the surrogate.—
504 (1) The surrogate, in accordance with the principal's
505 instructions, unless such authority has been expressly limited
506 by the principal, shall:
507 (c) Provide written consent using an appropriate form
508 whenever consent is required, including the execution of an a
509 physician's order not to resuscitate pursuant to s. 401.45 or a
510 patient-directed medical order pursuant to s. 765.3041 which
511 contains an order not to resuscitate or an order to withhold or
512 withdraw life-prolonging procedures.
513 Section 19. Subsection (2) of section 765.305, Florida
514 Statutes, is amended to read:
515 765.305 Procedure in absence of a living will.—
516 (2) Before exercising the incompetent patient's right to
517 forego treatment, including the execution of an order not to
518 resuscitate pursuant to s. 401.45 or a patient-directed medical
519 order pursuant to s. 765.3041 which contains an order not to
520 resuscitate or an order to withhold or withdraw life-prolonging
521 procedures, the surrogate must be satisfied that:
522 (a) The patient does not have a reasonable medical
523 probability of recovering capacity so that the right could be
524 exercised by the patient.
525 (b) The patient has an end-stage condition, the patient is
Page 21 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 369 2026
526 in a persistent vegetative state, or the patient's physical
527 condition is terminal.
528 Section 20. The Agency for Health Care Administration
529 shall create and update a database for the storage of patient-
530 directed medical orders, which shall be stored solely at the
531 option of the patient in electronic form by the agency.
532 Section 21. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 22 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb369-00